tests/data/morpheme-boundaries.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet></alphabet>
<sdefs>
  <sdef n="n"/><sdef n="sg"/><sdef n="pl"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>
  <pardef n="wol/f__n">
    <e><p><l>f</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>v<m/>es</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="church__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l><m/>es</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="cat__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l><m/>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ax/is__n">
    <e><p><l><m/>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l><m/>es</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
</pardefs>
<section id="main" type="standard">
  <e lm="cat"><i>cat</i><par n="cat__n"/></e>
  <e lm="wolf"><i>wol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
  <e lm="church"><i>church</i><par n="church__n"/></e>
  <e lm="bat"><i>bat</i><par n="cat__n"/></e>
  <e lm="rat"><i>rat</i><par n="cat__n"/></e>
  <e lm="axis"><i>ax</i><par n="ax/is__n"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
